Utah statutes.
72-3-108.   County roads -- Vacation and narrowing.

(1)  A county may, by ordinance, vacate, narrow, or change the name of a county road without petition or after petition by a property owner.

(2)  A county may not vacate a county road unless notice of the hearing is:

(a)  published:

(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for four consecutive weeks before the hearing; and

(ii) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for four weeks before the hearing; and

(b)  posted in three public places for four consecutive weeks prior to the hearing; and

(c)  mailed to the department and all owners of property abutting the county road.

(3)  The right-of-way and easements, if any, of a property owner and the franchise rights of any public utility may not be impaired by vacating or narrowing a county road.

(4)  Except as provided in Section 72-5-305, if a county vacates a county road, the state's right-of-way interest in the county road is also vacated.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session

